District of Columbia statutes.
31-3834

Hormone replacement therapy coverage.

An individual or group health plan, and a health insurer offering health care coverage that provides coverage for prescription drugs, shall provide benefits which cover any hormone replacement therapy that is prescribed or ordered for treating symptoms and conditions of menopause.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-254, § 5, 48 DCR 723